North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159G. Water Infrastructure.
Article 2. Water Infrastructure Loans and Grants Administered by Department.

§ 159G-30.
Department’s responsibility.

The Department, through the Division, administers the following:

Loans and grants made from the CWSRF, the DWSRF, the Wastewater Reserve, and the Drinking Water Reserve.

The award of funds by the Authority from the Community Development Block Grant program to local government units for infrastructure projects.

Grants made from the Viable Utility Reserve.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.3(jjj); 2013-360, s. 14.21(g); 2013-413, s. 57(t); 2014-115, s. 17; 2015-241, s. 14.13(c1); 2020-79, s. 1(c).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(a), provides: “The Division of Water Infrastructure is established as a new division within the environmental area of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Department of Environmental Quality]. All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Division of Water Quality of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources pertaining to the implementation and administration of Chapter 159G of the General Statutes are transferred to and vested in the Division of Water Infrastructure by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

. All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Division of Water Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources pertaining to the implementation and administration of Chapter 159G of the General Statutes are transferred to and vested in the Division of Water Infrastructure by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

. The Water Infrastructure Fund established under

G.S. 159G-22

and all accounts within the Water Infrastructure Fund under

G.S. 159G-22

shall be transferred to and administered by the Division of Water Infrastructure. In addition to its other duties set forth in Chapter 159G, the Division of Water Infrastructure shall be responsible for administering the program whereby local government units are awarded funds by the State Water Infrastructure Authority created by this section for infrastructure projects from community development block grant funds.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(o), provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes may conform names and titles changed by this section and may correct statutory references as required by this section throughout the General Statutes.” Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes made conforming changes in this section.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(jjj), effective July 1, 2011, twice substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Environmental Health.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(g), effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Infrastructure” for “Quality or the Division of Water Resources,” and deleted the former second and third sentences, which read: “The Division of Water Quality administers loans and grants from the CWSRF and the Wastewater Reserve. The Division of Water Resources administers loans and grants from the DWSRF and the Drinking Water Reserve.”

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(t), deleted “the Division of Water Quality and” preceding “the Division of Water” and deleted the former second and third sentences, which read: “The Division of Water Quality administers loans and grants from the CWSRF and the Wastewater Reserve. The Division of Water Resources administers loans and grants from the DWSRF and the Drinking Water Reserve.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(c1), effective July 1, 2015, added “and shall administer the award of funds by the State Water Infrastructure Authority from the Community Development Block Grant program to local government units for infrastructure projects.”

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(c), effective July 1, 2020, rewrote the section.

§ 159G-31.
Entities eligible to apply for loan or grant.

A local government unit or a nonprofit water corporation is eligible to apply for a loan or grant from the CWSRF, the DWSRF, the Wastewater Reserve, or the Drinking Water Reserve. An investor-owned drinking water corporation is also eligible to apply for a loan or grant from the DWSRF. Other entities are not eligible for a loan or grant from these accounts.

Entities eligible in subsection (a) of this section for grants from the Wastewater Reserve and the Drinking Water Reserve may be limited, based on affordability, to a portion of the total construction costs for the project types defined in G.S. 159G-33(a)(2) and G.S. 159G-34(a)(2).

To the extent that funds are available, loans shall be considered for the portion of construction costs not eligible for grant funding.

A local government unit is eligible to apply for a grant from the Viable Utility Reserve.

The Local Government Commission may submit an application on behalf of a distressed unit for an emergency grant from the Viable Utility Reserve to cover operating deficits of that local government unit’s public water system or wastewater system, and any such application shall be deemed approved by the Local Government Commission upon submission.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.11A(b); 2015-241, s. 14.13(c2); 2019-241, s. 11(h); 2020-79, ss. 1(d), 6(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(h), amended this section by adding a subsection (e), contingent upon 2019 SB 553 or 2019 HB 966 or substantially similar provision becoming law. SB 553 and HB 966 were both vetoed, and the General Assembly failed to override. Session Laws 2020-79, s. 6(a), repealed Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.11A(b), effective July 1, 2011, added the second sentence.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(c2), effective July 1, 2015, added the subsection (a) designation and added subsections (b) and (c).

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2020, added subsections (d) and (e).

§ 159G-32.
Projects eligible for loan or grant.

CWSRF and DWSRF. — Federal law determines whether a project is eligible for a loan or grant from the CWSRF and the DWSRF. A project must meet the eligibility requirements set under federal law.

Wastewater Reserve. — The Department is authorized to make loans and grants from the Wastewater Reserve for the following types of projects:

Wastewater collection system.

Wastewater treatment works.

Stormwater quality projects, including innovative stormwater management projects and pilot projects.

Nonpoint source pollution project.

Drinking Water Reserve. — The Department is authorized to make loans and grants from the Drinking Water Reserve for public water system projects.

Viable Utility Reserve. — The Department is authorized to make grants from the Viable Utility Reserve to do any of the following:

Provide physical interconnection and extension of public water or wastewater infrastructure to provide regional service.

Rehabilitate existing public water or wastewater infrastructure.

Decentralize an existing public water system or wastewater system into smaller viable parts.

Fund a study of any one or more of the following:

Rates.

Asset inventory and assessment.

Merger and regionalization options.

Fund other options deemed feasible which result in local government units generating sufficient revenues to adequately fund management and operations, personnel, appropriate levels of maintenance, and reinvestment that facilitate the provision of reliable water or wastewater services.

Provide emergency grants for operating deficits in accordance with G.S. 159G-34.5(a)(4).

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2013-360, s. 14.21(h); 2019-241, s. 11(e); 2020-79, ss. 1(e), 6(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(e), amended this section by adding a subdivision (d)(6), contingent upon 2019 SB 553 or 2019 HB 966 or substantially similar provision becoming law. SB 553 and HB 966 were both vetoed, and the General Assembly failed to override. Session Laws 2020-79, s. 6(a), repealed Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(h), effective July 1, 2013, added “, including innovative stormwater management projects and pilot projects” in subdivision (b)(3).

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(e), effective July 1, 2020, added subsection (d).

§ 159G-33.
Loans and grants available from Wastewater Reserve.

Types. — The Department is authorized to make the types of loans and grants listed in this subsection from the Wastewater Reserve. Each type of loan or grant must be administered through a separate account within the Wastewater Reserve.

Loan. — A loan is available for a project authorized in

G.S. 159G-32(b)

.

Project grant. — A project grant is available for a portion of the construction costs of a wastewater collection system project, a wastewater treatment works project, or a stormwater quality project as authorized in

G.S. 159G-32(b)

.

Merger/regionalization feasibility grant. — A merger/regionalization feasibility grant is available to determine the feasibility of consolidating the management of multiple utilities into a single utility operation or to provide regional treatment and the best way of carrying out the consolidation or regionalization. The Department shall not make a loan or grant under this subdivision for a merger or regionalization proposal that would result in a new surface water transfer regulated under

G.S. 143-215.22

L.

(3a)

Asset inventory and assessment grant. —

An asset inventory and assessment grant is available to inventory the existing water and/or sewer system and document the condition of the inventoried infrastructure.

Emergency loan. — An emergency loan is available in the event the Secretary certifies that a serious public health hazard related to the inadequacy of an existing wastewater collection system or wastewater treatment works is present or imminent in a community.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(a), effective November 6, 2019.

Interaccount Transfer. — The Secretary may use revenue in any account in the Wastewater Reserve to provide funds for an emergency loan.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 14.13(d), (e); 2019-226, s. 2; 2019-241, s. 11(a).

Editor’s Note.

At the direction of the Revisor of Statutes, subdivision (a)(4), as added by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(e), was redesignated as subdivision (a)(3a).

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(b), (c), provides: “(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 159G-33(a) and

G.S. 159B-34(a)

, during the 2019-2020 fiscal year, the Department may use funds in the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve to provide grants to the Local Government Commission to cover operating deficits in an enterprise fund accounting for a public water or wastewater system. For purposes of this section, ‘operating deficit’ is defined as a shortfall in an enterprise fund accounting for a public water or wastewater system between revenues plus available reserves and operating expenditures, including capital expenditures, necessary to maintain operations.

“Funding provided by this section is available only under either of the following circumstances:

“(1) The Local Government Commission has exercised its powers under

G.S. 159-181

to assume full or partial control over the affairs of the public water or wastewater system or of the unit of local government or public authority that owns or operates the public water or wastewater system.

“(2) The charter of the unit of local government or public authority that owns or operates the public water or wastewater system has been suspended or revoked by local act.

“(c) Funds for the purposes described in subsection (b) of this section may not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in each fiscal year. An application for a grant under this section for an emergency grant for operating deficits must be filed by the Local Government Commission on behalf of the local government unit. Applications for emergency grants for operating deficits are not subject to G.S. 159G-37(b).” Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(i), provides that this 2019-241, s. 11(b), (c), expires on the earlier of (i) the date that House Bill 966, 2019 Regular Session, becomes law or (ii) June 30, 2020. House Bill 966 did not become law, and subsections (b) and (c) of Session Laws 2019-241 expired on June 30, 2020.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(d), (e), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Loan.
— A loan is” for “General.
— A loan or grant is” in subdivision (a)(1); rewrote subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3); inserted subdivision (a)(4) (now (a)(3a)), pertaining to Asset inventory and assessment grant; and redesignated former subdivision (a)(4) as (a)(5) (now (a)(4)).

Session Laws 2019-226, s. 2, effective October 1, 2019, added subdivision (a)(5).

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(a), effective November 6, 2019, repealed subdivision (a)(5).

§ 159G-34.
Loans and grants available from Drinking Water Reserve.

Types. — The Department is authorized to make the types of loans and grants listed in this section from the Drinking Water Reserve. Each type of loan or grant must be administered through a separate account within the Drinking Water Reserve.

Loan. — A loan is available for a project for a public water system.

Project grant. — A project grant is available for a portion of the construction costs of a public water system project as defined in

G.S. 159G-32(c)

.

Merger/regionalization feasibility grant. — A merger/regionalization grant is available to determine the feasibility of consolidating the management of multiple utilities into a single utility operation or to provide regional water supply and the best way of carrying out the consolidation or regionalization. The Department shall not make a loan or grant under this subdivision for a merger or regionalization proposal that would result in a new surface water transfer regulated under

G.S. 143-215.22

L.

(3a)

Asset inventory and assessment grant. —

An asset inventory and assessment grant is available to inventory the existing water and/or sewer system and document the condition of the inventoried infrastructure.

Emergency loan. — An emergency loan is available to an applicant in the event the Secretary certifies that either a serious public health hazard or a drought emergency related to the water supply system is present or imminent in a community.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(a), effective November 6, 2019.

Interaccount Transfer. — The Secretary may use revenue in any account in the Drinking Water Reserve to provide funds for an emergency loan.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 14.13(f), (g); 2019-226, s. 3; 2019-241, s. 11(a).

Editor’s Note.

At the direction of the Revisor of Statutes, subdivision (a)(4), as added by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(g), was redesignated as subdivision (a)(3a).

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(b), (c), provides: “(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 159G-33(a) and

G.S. 159B-34(a)

, during the 2019-2020 fiscal year, the Department may use funds in the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve to provide grants to the Local Government Commission to cover operating deficits in an enterprise fund accounting for a public water or wastewater system. For purposes of this section, ‘operating deficit’ is defined as a shortfall in an enterprise fund accounting for a public water or wastewater system between revenues plus available reserves and operating expenditures, including capital expenditures, necessary to maintain operations.

“Funding provided by this section is available only under either of the following circumstances:

“(1) The Local Government Commission has exercised its powers under

G.S. 159-181

to assume full or partial control over the affairs of the public water or wastewater system or of the unit of local government or public authority that owns or operates the public water or wastewater system.

“(2) The charter of the unit of local government or public authority that owns or operates the public water or wastewater system has been suspended or revoked by local act.

“(c) Funds for the purposes described in subsection (b) of this section may not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in each fiscal year. An application for a grant under this section for an emergency grant for operating deficits must be filed by the Local Government Commission on behalf of the local government unit. Applications for emergency grants for operating deficits are not subject to G.S. 159G-37(b).” Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(i), provides that this 2019-241, s. 11(b), (c), expires on the earlier of (i) the date that House Bill 966, 2019 Regular Session, becomes law or (ii) June 30, 2020. House Bill 966 did not become law, and subsections (b) and (c) of Session Laws 2019-241 expired on June 30, 2020.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(f), (g), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Loan.
— A loan is” for “General.
— A loan or grant is” in subdivision (a)(1); rewrote subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3); inserted subdivision (a)(4) (now (a)(3a)), pertaining to Asset inventory and assessment grant; and redesignated former subdivision (a)(4) as (a)(5) (now (a)(4)).

Session Laws 2019-2265, s. 3, effective October 1, 2019, added subdivision (a)(5).

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(a), effective November 6, 2019, repealed subdivision (a)(5).

§§ 159G-34.1 through 159G-34.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 159G-34.5.
Grant types available from Viable Utility Reserve.

The Department is authorized to make the following types of grants from the Viable Utility Reserve:

Asset assessment and rate study grant. — An asset inventory and assessment grant is available to inventory the existing public water or wastewater system, or both, document the condition of the inventoried infrastructure, and conduct a rate study to determine a rate structure sufficient to prevent the local government unit from becoming a distressed unit.

Merger/regionalization feasibility grant. — A merger/regionalization grant is available to determine the feasibility of consolidating the management of multiple water or wastewater systems into a single operation or to provide regional treatment or water supply and the best way of carrying out the consolidation or regionalization. The Department shall not make a grant under this subdivision for a merger or regionalization proposal that would result in a new surface water transfer regulated under

G.S. 143-215.22

L.

Project grant. — A project grant is available for a portion of the costs of a public water system or wastewater project as defined in

G.S. 159G-32(d)

.

Emergency grant for operating deficit. — An emergency grant for operating deficits is available for distressed units if the Local Government Commission has exercised its powers under

G.S. 159-181

to assume full or partial control over the affairs of the public water or wastewater system or of the local government unit or public authority that owns or operates the public water or wastewater system.

A grant awarded from the Viable Utility Reserve may be awarded to a regional council of government created under Part 2 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes or to a regional planning commission created under Article 19 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes, if the Department and the Local Government Commission determine it is in the best interest of the local government unit.

Each type of grant must be administered through a separate account within the Viable Utility Reserve.

History.

2019-241, s. 11(f); 2020-79, ss. 1(f), 6(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 14, made this section effective July 1, 2020.

Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(f), amended this section by adding a subdivision (a)(4), contingent upon 2019 SB 553 or 2019 HB 966 or substantially similar provision becoming law. SB 553 and HB 966 were both vetoed, and the General Assembly failed to override. Session Laws 2020-79, s. 6(a), repealed Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(f).

§ 159G-35.
Criteria for loans and grants.

CWSRF and DWSRF. — Federal law determines the criteria for awarding a loan or grant from the CWSRF or the DWSRF. An award of a loan or grant from one of these accounts must meet the criteria set under federal law. The Department is directed to establish through negotiation with the United States Environmental Protection Agency the criteria for evaluating applications for loans and grants from the CWSRF and the DWSRF and the priority assigned to the criteria. The Department must incorporate the negotiated criteria and priorities in the Capitalization Grant Operating Agreement between the Department and the United States Environmental Protection Agency. The criteria and priorities incorporated in the Agreement apply to a loan or grant from the CWSRF or the DWSRF. The priority considerations in

G.S. 159G-23

do not apply to a loan or grant from the CWSRF or the DWSRF.

Certain Reserves. — The priority considerations in

G.S. 159G-23

apply to a loan or grant from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve. The Department may establish by rule other criteria that apply to a loan or grant from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve.

Viable Utility Reserve. — The Local Government Commission and the Authority shall jointly develop evaluation criteria for grants from the Viable Utility Reserve. These evaluation criteria shall be used to review applications and award grants as provided in

G.S. 159G-39

.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 14.13(h); 2020-79, s. 1(g).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(h), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “priority considerations” for “common criteria” in the last sentence of subsection (a) and in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(g), effective July 1, 2020, added “Certain” in the heading of subsection (b); and added subsection (c).

§ 159G-36.
Limits on loans and grants.

CWSRF and DWSRF. — Federal law governs loans and grants from the CWSRF and the DWSRF. An award of a loan or grant from one of these accounts must be consistent with federal law.

Certain Reserve Cost Limit. — The amount of a loan or grant from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve may not exceed the construction costs of a project. A loan or grant from one of these Reserves is available only to the extent that other funding sources are not reasonably available to the applicant.

(b1)

Viable Utility Reserve Cost Limit. —

The amount of a grant from the Viable Utility Reserve shall not exceed the construction costs of a project. A grant from this Reserve is available only to the extent that other funding sources are not reasonably available to the applicant.

Certain Reserve Recipient Limit. — The following limits apply to the loan or grant types made from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve to the same local government unit or nonprofit water corporation:

The amount of loans awarded for a fiscal year may not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000).

The amount of loans awarded for three consecutive fiscal years for targeted interest rate projects may not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000).

The amount of project grants awarded for three consecutive fiscal years may not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000).

The amount of merger/regionalization feasibility grants awarded for three consecutive fiscal years may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

The amount of asset inventory and assessment grants awarded for three consecutive fiscal years may not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

Viable Utility Reserve Recipient Limit. — Grants under the Viable Utility Reserve are limited as follows:

Grants for the purposes set forth in subdivisions (1) through (5) of G.S. 159-32(d) shall not exceed fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to any single local government unit. Where two or more local government units are merging into a single utility, the total grant awarded shall not exceed thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

Grants for the purpose set forth in G.S. 159-32(d)(6) to any single local government unit shall not (i) exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in any fiscal year and (ii) be awarded for more than three consecutive fiscal years.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 14.13(i); 2019-241, s. 11(g); 2020-79, ss. 1(h), 6(a).

Limitation on Certain Grants.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 12.13(b), provides: “Notwithstanding G.S. 159G-36(c), the amount of grants awarded under subdivision (a)(4) of this section may not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to the same grant recipient for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2019-241, s. 11(g), amended subsection (d) of this section, contingent upon 2019 SB 553 or 2019 HB 966 or substantially similar provision becoming law. SB 553 and HB 966 were both vetoed, and the General Assembly failed to override. Session Laws
2020-79, s. 6(a), repealed Session Laws
2019-241, s. 11(g).

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(i), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “the loan or grant types” for “a loan or grant” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (c); substituted “project grants” for “high-unit-cost grants” in subdivision (c)(3); substituted “merger/regionalization feasibility” for “technical assistance” in subdivision (c)(4); and added subdivision (c)(5).

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(h), effective July 1, 2020, added “Certain” in the subsection (b) heading; and added subsections (b1) and (d).

§ 159G-37.
Application to CWSRF, Wastewater Reserve, DWSRF, Drinking Water Reserve, and Viable Utility Reserve.

Application. — An application for a loan or grant from the CWSRF, the Wastewater Reserve, the DWSRF, or the Drinking Water Reserve, or a grant from the Viable Utility Reserve, must be filed with the Division. An application must be submitted on a form prescribed by the Division and must contain the information required by the Division. An applicant must submit to the Division any additional information requested by the Division to enable the Division to make a determination on the application. An application that does not contain information required on the application or requested by the Division is incomplete and is not eligible for consideration. An applicant may submit an application in as many categories as it is eligible for consideration under this Article.

Certification. — The Division shall require all local governments applying for loans or grants for water or wastewater purposes to certify that no funds received from water or wastewater utility operations have been transferred to the local government’s general fund for the purpose of supplementing the resources of the general fund. The prohibition in this section shall not be interpreted to include payments made to the local government to reimburse the general fund for expenses paid from that fund that are reasonably allocable to the regular and ongoing operations of the utility, including, but not limited to, rent and shared facility costs, engineering and design work, plan review, and shared personnel costs.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.3(kkk); 2013-360, s. 14.21(i); 2013-413, s. 57(u); 2014-100, s. 14.17; 2014-115, s. 17; 2020-79, s. 1(i).

Editor’s Note.

This section above was amended by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(i), and Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(u) in the coded bill drafting format provided by

G.S. 120-20.1

. The amendment by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(u) failed to incorporate the changes made by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(i). This section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.16, provides: “The Department of Environment and Natural Resources, Division of Water Infrastructure, and the State Water Infrastructure Authority shall give priority to loan and grant applications received from any local government meeting all of the following criteria:

“(1) The local government is located in a development tier one area.

“(2) The application seeks funding for a project that is required to be completed due to an EPA administrative order.

“(3) The application is deemed complete by the Division and meets the minimum requirements for the program from which it is seeking funding.”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2014.’ ”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 38.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2014-2015 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2014-2015 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 38.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(kkk), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Environmental Health” in the second sentence.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(i), effective July 1, 2013, in the first sentence, substituted “CWSRF, the DWSRF, the Wastewater Reserve, or the Drinking Water Reserve” for “CWSRF or the Wastewater Reserve” and “Infrastructure” for “Quality of the Department. An application for a loan or grant from the DWSRF or the Drinking Water Reserve must be file with the Division of Water Resources.”

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(u), substituted “CWSRF, the Wastewater Reserve, the DWSRF, or the Drinking Water Reserve must be filed with the” for “CWSRF or the Wastewater Reserve must be filed with the Division of Water Quality of the Department. An application for a loan or grant from the DWSRF or the Drinking Water Reserve must be filed with the” in the first sentence. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.17, effective July 1, 2014, added the subsection (a) designation; in present subsection (a), added the subsection heading, in the first sentence, inserted “for a load or grant from the” and “of the Department,” inserted “An application must” at the beginning of the present second sentence, and inserted “or” in the present next-to-last sentence; and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2020, added “and Viable Utility Reserve” at the end of the section heading; substituted “Reserve, or a grant from the Viable Utility Reserve, must be filed with the Division” for “Reserve, must be filed with the Division of Water Infrastructure of the Department” in the first sentence of subsection (a); and deleted “of Water Infrastructure” following “The Division” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

§ 159G-38.
Environmental assessment and public hearing.

Establish Environmental Assessment Process; Required Information. — The Division shall establish an environmental assessment process for projects funded from the CWSRF and DWSRF programs that is sufficient to meet federal environmental assessment requirements for such projects. Projects funded by the CWSRF or DWSRF shall meet the requirements of the environmental assessment process established pursuant to this subsection.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-90, s. 6, effective June 19, 2015.

Hearing. — The Division may hold a public hearing on an application for a loan or grant under this Article if it determines that holding a hearing will serve the public interest. An individual who is a resident of any county in which a proposed project is located may submit a written request for a public hearing. The request must set forth each objection to the proposed project or other reason for requesting a hearing and must include the name and address of the individual making the request. The Division may consider all written objections to the proposed project, any statement submitted with the hearing request, and any significant adverse effects the proposed project may have on the environment. The Division’s decision on whether to hold a hearing is conclusive. The Division must keep all written requests for a hearing on an application as part of the records pertaining to the application.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.3(lll), (mmm); 2013-360, s. 14.21(j), (o); 2013-413, s. 57(v); 2014-115, s. 17; 2015-90, s. 6.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-90, s. 8, made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2015-90, s. 6, applicable to State agency action occurring on or after June 19, 2015.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, ss. 13.3(
lll
) and 13.3(mmm), effective July 1, 2011, in the second sentence of subsections (b) and (c), substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Environmental Health.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(j), effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Infrastructure” for “Quality or the Division of Water Resources, as appropriate” in the first sentence of subsections (b) and (c).

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(v), substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Water Quality or the Division of Water Resources, as appropriate” in the first sentence of subsections (b) and (c). For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-90, s. 6, effective June 19, 2015, rewrote subsection (a); deleted former subsection (b), relating to division review; and substituted “The Division” for “The Division of Water Infrastructure” in the first sentence of subsection (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.